Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.110

Exemption from ordinary corporate taxes.

Such fraternal association shall be a body politic and corporate with all powers and incidents of a corporation upon its compliance with the provisions of this chapter; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such fraternal corporation shall not be subject to any license fee or other corporate tax of commercial corporations.

[ 1927 c 190 s 11; RRS s 3887-11.]